Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1732.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of transportation; design and construction of roundabout The sum of $3,000,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of transportation to distribute to the city of Page to design and construct a roundabout on South Lake Powell Boulevard.